Washington, session 2025-2026, SB5504.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF WASHINGTON:NEW SECTION.Â Â Sec. 1. (1) By December 1, 2025, the health care authority shall seek consultation from the federal centers for medicare and medicaid services for an approval of a state plan amendment to provide payment to a home health agency for complex care services as a component of the private duty nursing benefit when provided to an enrollee under 18 years old receiving private duty nursing in a medical assistance program under chapter 74.09 RCW when:(a) The caregiver providing the complex care services is a parent, guardian, family member, or other close association that is the equivalent of a family relation of the enrollee;(b) The caregiver has successfully completed at least 75 total hours of instruction offered by a home health agency that is accredited by an organization recognized by the health care authority and has been determined to be competent to provide complex care services;(c) The caregiver is educated and trained by a registered nurse licensed under chapter 18.79 RCW to provide complex care services to the patient; and(d) The caregiver providing the complex care services is employed by a home health agency licensed under chapter 70.126 RCW with a provider agreement with the health care authority or a managed care organization.(2) By January 1, 2026, the health care authority shall submit a status report to the appropriate policy and fiscal committees of the legislature detailing the feasibility of an approval for a state plan amendment as outlined in subsection (1) of this section.(3) This section expires December 31, 2026.--- END ---